src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-puuqdwz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - pūʼdõz: # adjectives 183 'eng /est puhas/fin' - full paradigm
     pūʼdõz+A+Sg+Nom: [pūʼdõz, pūdõz]
     pūʼdõz+A+Sg+Gen: [pūʼdõ, pūdõ]
     pūʼdõz+A+Sg+Par: [pūʼdõzt, pūdõzt]
     pūʼdõz+A+Sg+Dat: [pūʼdõn, pūdõn]
     pūʼdõz+A+Sg+Ins: [pūʼdõks, pūdõks]
     pūʼdõz+A+Sg+Ill: [pūʼdõz, pūʼdõ, pūdõz, pūdõ]
     pūʼdõz+A+Sg+Ela: [pūʼdõst, pūdõst]
     pūʼdõz+A+Pl+Nom: [pūʼdõd, pūdõd]
     pūʼdõz+A+Pl+Gen: [pūʼdõd, pūdõd]
     pūʼdõz+A+Pl+Par: [pūʼdidi, pūdidi]
     pūʼdõz+A+Pl+Dat: [pūʼdõdõn, pūdõdõn]
     pūʼdõz+A+Pl+Ins: [pūʼdõdõks, pūdõdõks]
     pūʼdõz+A+Pl+Ill: [pūʼdiž, pūdiž]
     pūʼdõz+A+Pl+Ela: [pūʼdist, pūdist]
